Washington statutes.
RCW 43.30.660

Collection of minerals for exhibition.

The department may, from time to time, prepare special collections of ores and minerals representative of the mineral industry of the state to be displayed or used at any world fair, exposition, mining congress, or state exhibition, in order to promote information relating to the mineral wealth of the state.

[ 2003 c 334 s 111; 1988 c 127 s 6; 1965 c 8 s 43.21.090. Prior: 1935 c 142 s 4; RRS s 8614-4. Formerly RCW 43.30.145, 43.21.090.]

NOTES:

Intent—2003 c 334: See note following RCW 79.02.010.